Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-811
Project, defined.

(1) Project means any property located within the state that may be used or will be useful in connection with the instruction, feeding, recreation, or housing of students, the provision of health care services to members of the general public, the provision of cultural services to members of the general public, the provision of social services to members of the general public, the conducting of research, administration, or other work of an eligible institution, or any combination of the foregoing. Project includes, but is not limited to, an academic facility, administrative facility, agricultural facility, assembly hall, assisted-living facility, athletic facility, auditorium, campus, communication facility, congregate care housing, emergency services facility, exhibition hall, health care facility, health service institution, hospital, housing for faculty and other staff, instructional facility, laboratory, library, maintenance facility, medical clinic, medical services facility, museum, nursing or skilled nursing services facility, offices, parking area, personal care services facility, physical educational facility, recreational facility, research facility, senior, retirement, or home care services facility, social services facility, stadium, storage facility, student facility, student health facility, student housing, student union, theatre, or utility facility.

(2) Project also means and includes the refunding or refinancing of outstanding obligations, mortgages, or advances, including advances from an endowment or similar fund, originally issued, made, or given by the eligible institution to finance the cost of a project or projects, and including the financing of eligible swap termination payments, whenever the authority finds that such refunding or refinancing is in the public interest and either:

(a) Alleviates a financial hardship upon the eligible institution;

(b) Results in a lesser cost of education, health care, housing, cultural services, or social and related support services to the eligible institution's students, patients, residents, clients, and other general public consumers; or

(c) Enables the eligible institution to offer greater security for the financing of a new project or projects or to effect savings in interest costs or more favorable amortization terms.

Laws 1981, LB 321, § 5;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2905;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 8;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1708;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 11;

Laws 2019, LB224, § 9.